Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB312.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 189.993 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any person who violates KRS 189.045 shall be fined not less than one hundred
dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).
(2) Any person convicted of violating any of the provisions of KRS 189.095 shall be
fined sixty dollars ($60) and costs of prosecution.
(3) Any person who violates any provision of KRS 189.205 shall be fined not less than
twenty dollars ($20) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100).
(4) Any person who violates any provision of KRS 189.375 shall be fined not less than
twenty dollars ($20) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100).
(5) Any person who violates KRS 189.505 shall:
(a) For the first offense, be fined one thousand dollars ($1,000)[not less than
sixty dollars ($60) nor more than two hundred dollars ($200)] or be
imprisoned for not more than thirty (30) days, or both;
(b) For a second or subsequent offense, be fined two thousand dollars ($2,000)
or be imprisoned for not more than thirty (30) days, or both; and
(c) In accordance with KRS 70.155 or 82.625, have any motor vehicle used by
the person in the commission of the violation impounded for not less than
six (6) months.
(6) Any person found violating any provision of KRS 189.820 or 189.830 is guilty of a
misdemeanor and shall be fined not less than twenty dollars ($20) nor more than
thirty-five dollars ($35).
(7) Any person who violates KRS 189.920 shall be fined not less than one hundred
dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or imprisoned in the
county jail for not more than thirty (30) days, or both. In the case of a private
vehicle not authorized to use emergency lights under KRS 189.920, all lighting and
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 1/31/2025 4:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1417
other equipment used in violation of KRS 189.910 to 189.950 shall be confiscated
and forfeited to the county in which the offense occurred.
(8) Any person who violates KRS 189.930 shall be fined not less than sixty dollars
($60) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500), or be imprisoned in the county jail
for not more than thirty (30) days, or both.
(9) Any person who violates KRS 189.940 shall be fined not less than sixty dollars
($60) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or be imprisoned in the county
jail for not more than six (6) months, or both. In the case of a private vehicle, except
as outlined in subsection (11) of this section, all lighting and other equipment used
in violation of KRS 189.910 to 189.950 shall be confiscated and forfeited to the
county in which the offense occurred.
(10) If a member of a regular or volunteer fire department, ambulance service, or rescue
squad violates any provisions of subsection (6) of KRS 189.940, he or she shall, in
addition to any other penalty provided under KRS 189.990 or this section, be
immediately dismissed from his or her membership or employment with the fire
department, ambulance service, or rescue squad and shall be disqualified from
being employed by or being a member of any fire department, ambulance service,
or rescue squad in the Commonwealth for a period of three (3) years. Upon
conviction of a second offense he or she shall be permanently barred from
employment or membership in any fire department, ambulance service, rescue
squad, police department, or sheriff's office in the Commonwealth, nor shall he or
she be permitted to operate any public safety vehicle as defined in KRS 189.910.
(11) (a) Any person who violates KRS 189.950(3) shall be fined one hundred dollars
($100) for the first offense, two hundred dollars ($200) for the second offense,
and one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each subsequent offense.
(b) Except as provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection, any person who
violates KRS 189.950 shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100)
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 1/31/2025 4:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1417
nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or be imprisoned in the county
jail for not more than thirty (30) days, or both. In the case of a privately
owned vehicle, all lighting and other equipment used or installed in violation
of KRS 189.910 to 189.950 shall be confiscated and forfeited to the county in
which the offense occurred.
(12) Any person who violates any provision of this chapter for which no penalty is
otherwise provided shall, upon conviction, be fined not less than twenty dollars
($20) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100) for each offense, except that no
penalty shall be assessed for a violation of KRS 189.580(1)(b) or (6)(b).
(13) No producer or processor of natural resources shall allow the transporting of natural
resources over the highways of the Commonwealth in excess of the weight limits
without possessing a resource recovery road hauling permit. Violation for hauling
in excess of prescribed limits without possession of a permit or transporting natural
resources over prescribed limits of the resource recovery road hauling permit shall
be not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than one thousand dollars
($1,000) for each violation and shall be deposited in the resource recovery road
fund.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 1/31/2025 4:15 PM Jacketed